Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB810.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324 "Director." The director of the office."Economically significant regulation." A regulation that, if promulgated and implemented, may reasonably be expected to result in direct or indirect cost to the Commonwealth, to its political subdivisions and to the private sector in excess of $1,000,000 on an annual basis.* * *"Legislative day." A day when both houses of the General Assembly are in voting session."Office." The Office of Government Efficiency.* * *"Selection committee." The Selection and Organization Committee in the office.* * *Section 2. Section 5(a)(1.1) and (4) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 5. Proposed regulations; procedures for review.(a) On the same date that an agency submits a proposed regulation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication of notice of proposed rulemaking in the Pennsylvania Bulletin as required by the Commonwealth Documents Law, the agency shall submit to the commission and the committees a copy of the proposed regulation and a regulatory analysis form which includes the following:* * *(1.1) A specific citation to the Federal or State statutory or regulatory authority or the decision of a Federal or State court under which the agency is proposing the regulation, which the regulation is designed to implement or which may mandate or affect compliance with the 20250SB0810PN0855 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulation. In the case of a citation of State statutory authority, the citation must be to a provision of the statute that explicitly states that the agency may promulgate regulations for the specific purpose cited in the statement of need for the regulation under paragraph (3).* * *(4) Estimates of the direct and indirect costs to the Commonwealth, to its political subdivisions and to the private sector. [Insofar as the proposed regulation relates to costs to the Commonwealth, the agency may submit in lieu of its own statement the fiscal note prepared by the Office of the Budget pursuant to section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."] The estimates shall be prepared by the Independent Fiscal Office and submitted to the agency for inclusion in the regulatory analysis form and shall include an estimate of the annual costs to be used to determine whether the regulation is an economically significant regulation.* * *(d.1) The committees shall, during the public comment period, conduct a public hearing to receive comments regarding a proposed economically significant regulation. The agency shall appear at the hearing if requested to do so by the chair of the committee.* * *(i) All forms required for implementation of a regulation must be included with the regulatory analysis form when submitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau, the committees and the commission under subsection (a).(j) The commission shall transmit comments regarding the 20250SB0810PN0855 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cost estimates required under subsection (a)(4) to the Independent Fiscal Office for review.Section 3. Section 5.1(e), (j.2), (j.3) and (l) of the act are amended to read:Section 5.1. Final-form regulations and final-omitted regulations; procedures for review.* * *(e) The commission may have until its next scheduled meeting which occurs no less than 30 days after receipt of the final-form or final-omitted regulation to approve or disapprove the final-form or final-omitted regulation. Notwithstanding subsections (j.1) and (j.2), at any time prior to 24 hours before the commission's meeting to consider a regulation, a committee may notify the commission and the agency that the committee disapproves or intends to further review the final-form regulation. If notified by a committee that the committee disapproves of a regulation, the commission may not approve or disapprove the regulation for a period of 30 days or nine legislative days, whichever is longer. If notified by a committee that the committee intends to further review a final-form regulation, the commission may not approve or disapprove the regulation for a period of 14 days or six legislative days, whichever is longer. The commission shall notify the agency and the committees of its approval or disapproval. If the commission does not disapprove the final-form or final-omitted regulation within the time allotted in this subsection, the commission shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation.* * *(j.2) (1) At any time during the commission's review period 20250SB0810PN0855 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 up to 24 hours prior to the opening of the commission's public meeting, a committee may notify the commission and the agency that it has approved or disapproved a final-form or final-omitted regulation or that it intends to review the regulation.(2) If the commission approves a regulation and a committee has not notified the commission and the agency that it has disapproved the regulation or that it intends to review the regulation, the agency may promulgate the regulation. If the commission approves a regulation and a committee has notified the commission and the agency that it has disapproved the regulation or that it intends to review the regulation, the agency may not promulgate the regulation for 14 days or six legislative days, whichever is longer, after the committee has received the commission's approval order.(3) During [this 14-day period] the period established under paragraph (2), the committee may take action on the regulation pursuant to section 7(d). If at the expiration of the [14-day] period established under paragraph (2) the committee has not taken action on the regulation pursuant to section 7(d), the agency may promulgate the regulation.(j.3) If the committees are prevented from completing their [14-day] review during the period established under subsection (j.2)(2) because of adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session in an even-numbered year, their review of the final-form or final-omitted regulation shall automatically be suspended until the fourth Monday in January of the next year. On that date, the agency shall resubmit the final-form or final-omitted regulation and required material to the committees 20250SB0810PN0855 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the commission. If either committee has not been designated by the fourth Monday in January, the agency may not deliver the final-form or final-omitted regulation and required material to the committees and the commission until both committees are designated. If the agency does not deliver the final-form or final-omitted regulation and required material to the commission and the committees by the second Monday after the date by which both committee designations have been published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, the agency shall be deemed to have withdrawn the final-form or final-omitted regulation. In determining the remaining time for committee review, the number of days in which the committees have had the final-form or the final-omitted regulation under review as of the adjournment sine die or expiration of the prior session shall be subtracted from the [14-day] committee review period established under subsection (j.2)(2), but the committee review period in the next succeeding legislative session shall not be less than ten days. An agency may not submit a final-form or final-omitted regulation to the commission or the committees for review during the period from the adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session of an even-numbered year to the date by which both committees have been designated in the next succeeding legislative session. This subsection shall not apply to emergency-certified regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 6(d).* * *(l) Except for emergency-certified regulations adopted under section 6(d), an agency may not promulgate a regulation until completion of the review provided for in this act[.] and, if the regulation is an economically significant regulation, the 20250SB0810PN0855 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Assembly adopts a concurrent resolution under section 7.2.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.3. Regulations deemed withdrawn.A regulation shall be deemed withdrawn if there is no provision of a State statute which explicitly states that the agency may promulgate regulations for the specific purpose cited in the statement of need for the regulation under section 5(a)(3) and the regulatory analysis form submitted for the regulation does not comply with the requirements of section 5(a)(1.1).Section 5. Section 7(d) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 7. Procedures for subsequent review of disapproved final-form or final-omitted regulations.* * *(d) Upon receipt of the commission's order pursuant to subsection (c.1) or at the expiration of the commission's review period if the commission does not act on the regulation or does not deliver its order pursuant to subsection (c.1), [one] the following apply:(1) One or both of the committees may, within 14 calendar days or six legislative days, whichever is longer, report to the House of Representatives or Senate a concurrent resolution and notify the agency. During the [14-calendar-day] period specified in this paragraph, the agency may not promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation. If, by the expiration of the [14-calendar-day] period specified in this paragraph, neither committee reports a concurrent resolution, the committees shall be deemed to have approved 20250SB0810PN0855 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the final-form or final-omitted regulation, and the agency may promulgate that regulation.(2) If either committee reports a concurrent resolution before the expiration of the [14-day] period specified in paragraph (1), the [Senate and the House of Representatives] chamber to which the concurrent resolution is reported shall [each] have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the concurrent resolution has been reported, to adopt the concurrent resolution[.] and transmit it to the other chamber. The other chamber shall have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the concurrent resolution has been transmitted, to adopt the concurrent resolution.(3) If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution by majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives within 60 calendar days or 20 legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which a concurrent resolution has been reported out by a committee, the concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(4) If the Governor does not return the concurrent resolution to the General Assembly within ten calendar days after it is presented, the Governor shall be deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution.(5) If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution, the General Assembly may override that veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten 20250SB0810PN0855 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 legislative days, whichever is longer, to override the veto. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or override the veto in the time prescribed in this [subsection] paragraph, it shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(6) Notice as to any final disposition of a concurrent resolution considered in accordance with this [section] subsection shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(7) The bar on promulgation of the final-form or final-omitted regulation shall continue until that regulation has been approved or deemed approved in accordance with this subsection.(8) If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution and the Governor approves or is deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution or if the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution, the agency shall be barred from promulgating the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(9) An agency shall be prohibited from reissuing the same regulation in the future, or promulgating a regulation that is substantially similar, unless the new or revised regulation is specifically authorized by a law enacted after the date on which the concurrent resolution is approved or deemed to be approved by the Governor or after the date when the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution.(10) If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or if the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution and the General Assembly does not override the Governor's veto, the agency may promulgate the 20250SB0810PN0855 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 final-form or final-omitted regulation.(11) The General Assembly may, at its discretion, adopt a concurrent resolution disapproving the final-form or final-omitted regulation to indicate the intent of the General Assembly but permit the agency to promulgate that regulation.(e) A committee may report a concurrent resolution to initiate the repeal of any regulation currently in effect, provided that the committee conducts a public hearing on the matter prior to reporting the concurrent resolution.(1) If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution by majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives, the concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(2) If the Governor does not return the concurrent resolution to the General Assembly within ten calendar days after it is presented, the Governor shall be deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution.(3) If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution, the General Assembly may override the veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, to override the veto.(4) If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or override the veto in the time prescribed in paragraphs (2) and (3), the regulation shall remain in effect. An agency shall be prohibited from reissuing the same regulation in the future, or promulgating a regulation that is substantially similar, unless the new or revised regulation is specifically authorized by a law 20250SB0810PN0855 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enacted after the date on which the concurrent resolution is approved or deemed to be approved by the Governor or after the date when the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution.Section 6. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.2. Concurrent resolution required for economically significant regulations.(a) If the commission issues an order to approve a final-form regulation or final-omitted regulation that is an economically significant regulation or if an agency decides to proceed with a final-form regulation or final-omitted regulation that is an economically significant regulation for which the commission issued a disapproval order, the following shall apply:(1) The agency shall submit a copy of the order to the Senate and House of Representatives.(2) If applicable, the agency shall submit to the Senate and the House of Representatives the agency's response to the order.(3) The agency shall request a concurrent resolution approving the regulation. (b) The concurrent resolution under subsection (a)(3) shall be referred to the applicable standing committee of the Senate and the applicable standing committee of the House of Representatives. A concurrent resolution that is reported from the standing committee of the Senate shall be placed on the Senate calendar. A concurrent resolution that is reported from the standing committee of the House of Representatives shall be placed on the House calendar.(c) The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each 20250SB0810PN0855 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the agency requested the concurrent resolution under subsection (a)(3) to consider the concurrent resolution. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution in the time prescribed in this subsection, the final-form regulation or final-omitted regulation shall be deemed not approved and the regulation shall not take effect.(d) This section shall not apply to emergency-certified regulations adopted under section 6(d).Section 7. Section 8.1 of the act is amended to read:Section 8.1. Existing regulations.The commission, on its motion or at the request of any person or member of the General Assembly, may review any existing regulation which has been in effect for at least three years. If a committee of the Senate or the House of Representatives requests a review of an existing regulation, the commission shall perform the review and shall assign it high priority. The commission may submit recommendations to an agency recommending changes in existing regulations if it finds the existing regulations to be contrary to the public interest under the criteria established in section 5.2. The commission may also make recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor for statutory changes if the commission finds that any existing regulation may be contrary to the public interest. Unless prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth, at the time an agency promulgates a new regulation, the agency shall identify at least two existing regulations for repeal.Section 8. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 12.2. State agency regulatory compliance officers.20250SB0810PN0855 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Each agency shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To designate an employee as the agency's regulatory compliance officer.(2) To empower the regulatory compliance officer under paragraph (1) to develop agency policies and initiatives to further the purpose of this section, including the following:(i) Educating the regulated community regarding the implementation of new or amended statutes and regulations prior to the effective date of implementation, to the extent practicable and during implementation.(ii) Establishing clear channels of communication through which members of regulated communities can contact the agency with questions or concerns regarding regulations.(iii) Working with regulated communities to resolve noncompliance issues before imposing penalties.(iv) Providing a detailed explanation of each regulatory requirement under the agency's jurisdiction, including expectations for compliance, guidelines for measuring compliance and the primary benefit of each requirement.(3) To empower the regulatory compliance officer to issue to any person, upon the person's request, an opinion with respect to the person's duties under a regulation of the agency. The opinion shall be provided within 20 business days of the request, provided that the time may be extended for good cause. The opinion, or the agency's failure to provide an opinion upon request, shall be a complete defense in any enforcement proceeding initiated by the agency and evidence of good faith conduct in any other civil or criminal 20250SB0810PN0855 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeding if the requester, at least 20 business days prior to the alleged violation, requested written advice from the agency's regulatory compliance officer in good faith, disclosed truthfully all the material facts and committed the acts complained of either in reliance on the advice or because of the failure of the agency to provide advice within 20 business days, or any later extended time, of the request.(4) To empower the regulatory compliance officer to establish guidelines for waiving any fines or penalties that the officer's agency would be authorized to impose on a regulated entity for a violation of a statute or regulation that the agency enforces if the entity reports a violation to the regulatory compliance officer before a fine or penalty is imposed on the entity. In order to be eligible for a waiver of fines or penalties, the regulated entity must report to the regulatory compliance officer the steps it has taken or will take to remedy the violation.(5) To empower the regulatory compliance officer to request and obtain any information or advice from other staff of the agency that the officer may need to fulfill the duties of the compliance officer position.(6) To establish clear channels of communication through which businesses seeking to become members of regulated communities can contact the agency with questions or concerns relating to starting a business and future compliance with regulations.(b) No later than January 31 of each year, each agency shall submit to the General Assembly an annual report detailing all of the following:(1) The progress made by the agency and the regulatory 20250SB0810PN0855 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance officer in the preceding calendar year toward compliance with this section.(2) The number of regulated communities served.(3) The type of regulated communities served.Section 12.3. Office of Government Efficiency . (a) The nonpartisan Office of Government Efficiency is established within the Independent Regulatory Review Commission.(b) The office shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Adopt logical, quantitative and qualitative rules to determine whether an existing statute or regulation of the Commonwealth is:(i) Unreasonable, unduly burdensome, detrimental to economic well-being, duplicative, onerous, defective or in conflict with another statute or regulation.(ii) Defying a common sense approach to government.(2) Perform a systematic review of existing statutes and regulations of this Commonwealth in accordance with the rules adopted for review under this act.(3) Identify existing statutes and regulations that may be appropriate for legislative and executive agency modification, revision or repeal.(4) Establish as soon as practical a system with a publicly accessible Internet website that allows the office to receive:(i) Suggestions and comments, along with supporting documentation, for modification, revision or repeal from citizens, businesses, government agencies or others.(ii) Reports on allegations of wasteful governmental practices.(5) Determine and implement internal policies, standards 20250SB0810PN0855 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and procedures as may be necessary for the orderly and efficient execution of the mission of the office.(6) Implement a tracking system to follow all submissions and actions taken on a recommendation made by the director which includes progress of modification, revision or repeal.(7) By June 30 of each year, report to the General Assembly and the Governor on:(i) Recommended changes to statutes and regulations.(ii) Recommended changes to increase efficiency and eliminate wasteful practices.(iii) Progress of the revision, repeal or abrogation of statutes and regulations.(c) The committee established in the office shall:(1) Consist of the following members:(i) One member appointed by the Governor.(ii) One member appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate in consultation with the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate.(iii) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives in consultation with the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(2) Within 30 days from the effective date of this section, select a director of the office in accordance with the following:(i) The committee shall provide and transmit the qualifications of the director to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 90 days of the 20250SB0810PN0855 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 first meeting of the committee.(ii) The appointment may not be made on the basis of political affiliation.(iii) The appointment shall be made on the basis of the fitness to perform the duties of the office based on the published qualifications.(d) The director shall appoint a deputy director who shall have the following duties:(1) Perform assigned duties from the director.(2) Assume the role of the director:(i) during an absence or incapacity of the director; or(ii) if a vacancy occurs in the position of director until a successor director is appointed.(e) The director may be removed by a concurrent resolution passed by the Senate and the House of Representatives.(f) The director shall have the following powers and duties:(1) The authority to:(i) Determine and implement internal policies, standards and protocols to orderly and efficiently carry out the mission of the office under this section.(ii) Procure the temporary or intermittent service of attorneys, experts, consultants or organizations by contract.(2) Hire and fix compensation in accordance with the following:(i) The hiring and appointments shall be made on the basis of the duties of the office and the performance of the functions of the office.(ii) All personnel shall be hired or appointed 20250SB0810PN0855 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without regard to political affiliation.(iii) Hiring and appointments shall be based on fitness to perform the necessary duties.(g) (1) When the office determines that a statute or regulation meets the standards set under this section and as set by the director for modification, revision or repeal, the director shall recommend the action to:(i) The General Assembly if a statute needs to be modified, revised or repealed.(ii) The State department or agency that promulgated the regulation that needs to be modified, revised or repealed.(2) A recommendation from the office shall provide specific details why the office is recommending that the statute or regulation needs to be modified, revised or repealed.(h) The office shall be a Commonwealth agency for the purposes of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(i) The office shall be abolished and cease to exist five years from the effective date of this section.Section 9. The amendment or addition of the following provisions of the act shall apply to any regulation prepared in final form on or after the effective date of this section:(1) The definitions of "economically significant regulation" and "legislative day" in section 3.(2) Section 5(a)(1.1) and (4), (d.1), (i) and (j).(3) Section 5.1(e), (j.2), (j.3) and (l).(4) Section 5.3.(5) Section 7(d).20250SB0810PN0855 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Section 7.2.Section 10. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0810PN0855 - 19 - 12